utilities/dictionaries/nds_NDS-LowGerman.dic
bann/s
Bever/s
beetst/ZTQXztqx
beten/ZTQXztqx
bleek/DWMOARHUVF
bleev/DWAQHPTUVX
boen/JAZUÜPHBFKQIDWejazuüphfkq
bögen/qrycjhpzkgtvfxü
boog/DQRYCJHPZKGTVFXÜ
bogen/QRYCJHPZKGTVFXÜ
böst/sYZRUGPQ
box/s
breden/UV
breken/aqptvü
breek/WAQPTVÜ
brickst/AQPTVÜ
brickt/AQPTVÜ
braken/AQPTVÜ
bringen/IDWAQRJPYCUVFX
bringen/aqrjpycufx
brummeln/IDWMO
buddeln/IDWMOQRJZGTUVÜ
buddeln/qrjzgtuü
buen/moaqbjptcuf
dalvern/IDWMO
danzen/IDWMOQYCHZKGFXÜ
danzen/qychzkgfxü
defineer/sF
dehnen/IDWMOU
denken/bruvfxüh
deit/APTVX
dee/APTVX
drammen/IDWMO
dröppst/ABJT
dregen/cuaqbjptyfx
dreeg/WAQBJPTYCUVFX
driggst/AQBJPTYCUVFX
drogen/AQBJPTYCUVFX
dragen/AQBJPTYCUVFX
drieven/qarycpzkgtuxü
drifft/QABRYCPZKGTUVXÜ
dreven/QABRYCPZKGTUVXÜ
drömen/hzu
droppen/IDWMOQRZGX
droppen/qrzgx
drücken/qrjptycux
drüppeln/qbrcpzkgtux
dubbelklicken/IDWMO
duern/IDWMO
dukeln/IDWMO
duken/qrcjpx
dwallen/IDWMO
enanner/ARJHPTUFÜ
fallen/IDWAQBRJPZGTCUVXL
fallen/aqrjpzgtcuvxl
fangen/IDWAQJPV
faten/ABRJPZTVÜ
feeg/CYZRUGQXs
fiern/zg
funnen/IDQJPGX
flackern/IDWP
flaggen/IDWMOBJUÜ
flechten/arjpzkgtufü
flegen/aqrycjptuvfxü
flüggt/AQRYCJPTUVFXÜ
flagen/AQRYCJPTUVFXÜ
flicken/IDWMOAJPZKTU
flicken/ajpzktu
föddern/aqjp
föhlen/arcjfzt
föhr/sOAQBRJHPZKGYCUVFXL
föhren/aqrjhpzkgycufxl
fohr/sOAQBRJHPZKGYCUVFXL
fohren/aqrjhpzkgycufxl
fragen/AQBHUFH
fragen/aqhufh
freren/qarjtu
froor/DQARJTUV
freten/QARJPZGTUVX
freet/DQARJPZGTUVX
freuen/IDW
füllen/jzuüphq
füllen/ajptüru
gahn/AQBRJHPZGTYYUVFXÜL
gahn/aqbrjhpzgtyyuvfxül
gah/AQBRJHPZGTYCUVFXÜL
geihst/AQBRJHPZGTYCUVFXÜL
geiht/AQBRJHPZGTYCUVFXÜL
gaht/AQBRJHPZGYTCUVFXÜL
gungst/AQBRJHPZGTYCUVFXÜL
geven/aqrjpgtyzufx
geev/ABQRJPGTYZUVFX
gifft/ABRJPGTYZUVFX
geevt/ABQRJPGTYZUVFX
geevst/ABRJPGTYZUVFX
glieken/aqu
glickst/AQBUV
groov/DQRJPZGUVFÜ
grenzen/AQBJU
grepen/AQBRJPTYUVFX
grööt/B
gründt/MOB
halen/QVUYPJHZKG
halen/quypjhzkg
hanneln/IDWMOQBJUV
hauen/CZRTUÜGVKQXczrtuügkqx
helpen/IDWQBPUqpu
heven/arpzkguvx
heev/DWMOARPZKGUVX
hollen/AQBRJPTYCUVF
hollen/aqrjptycuf
heel/DAQBRJPTYCUVF
höör/DWMOAFJPTYCVX
jöök/s
jumpen/aqrycjpzkgtvfx
kaken/jartuphfq
kamen/ABRHPZKGYCUVFXL
kamen/arhpzkgycufxl
keem/DABRHPZKGYCUVFXL
kumm/DWABRHPZKGYCUVFXL
kauen/IDWMOQARGTUF
kauen/oqargtuf
kenn/sBUV
kieken/aqrjhtycux
keek/DAQBRJHTYCUVX
keken/AQBRJHTYCUVX
kippen/IDWMOQARHZKGTUVXÜ
kippen/qarhzkgtuxü
klaag/sABRJGVX
kleden/ajuvü
kloppen/augpkqx
kniepen/IWQBRT
knüppen/oaqjtü
kööp/WAQJPTVFX
köff/DWAQJPTVFX
köffen/AQJPTVFX
körten/qjx
krabbel/CYZRGKXs
krabbeln/cyzrgkx
kriegen/qjpzkgcx
lagern/aqjuü
lasten/aqpu
laat/AQBRJHTUVX
leet/DAQBRJHTUVX
ledden/IDWMOAQRYJTUVÜ
ledden/aqryjtuü
leggen/IDWMOAQBJPTYCUVFXL
leggen/aqjptycufxl
leed/DAQBJPTYCUVFXL
lehnen/IDWMOAQYCFX
lesen/jqhpuf
levern/IDWMOAQBJU
lichten/IDWMOQABPZKGX
lichten/qapzkgx
locken/aryczkgvx
lopen/aqrjptycufx
loop/WAQBRJPTYCUVFX
luern/bp
luustern/rhz
mitmaak/s
mahnen/qa
malen/QABHPZKUVFXÜ
malen/qahpzkufxü
mark/sABPVF
maskeer/sHVh
mellen/IAQJV
muchen/IDWMOV
nageln/IDWMOARJPTVF
nehmen/aqjptycufx
nöhmen/IDAQJPTYCUVFX
nimm/DWAQJPTYCUVFX
neihen/qahktuxü
packen/IDWMOAQBYCJPZKGTUVFXÜ
parken/IDWMOQCJZKGTUXÜ
parken/qcjzkgtuxü
passen/IDWMOAQRJPTV
pingeln/IDWMOARYGF
plaanst/BCCJTVFÜ
plück/Qs
pluustern/IDWMOP
proppen/IDWMOABRHZGTVF
puust/ZUÜX
quälen/qryczkg
raden/aq
realiseer/s
reisen/aqbrycjtuvfx
rennen/cyzügx
richten/IDWMOAFBJPTYCUV
rieden/arycjhzkgtufxü
riddst/ARYCJHZKGTUFXÜ
rieten/IAQBRJPUVX
rögen/atx
röhren/atx
röppt/AQBRPTU
rücken/qycjpuvfxü
rüüm/DWMOQJPUX
rutsch/CYZRUGVQXLs
rutschen/cyzrugqxl
sammel/sQAJHPZKGUVFX
sammeln/qajhpzkguvfx
schapen/ayczkgx
scheer/DWMOARJU
scheten/qrjp
schütt/QBRJP
schick/sABQRJTYCVFX
schicken/aqrjtycfx
schienen/arpg
schieten/qazkgtux
scheet/DQABZKGTUVX
schrieven/aqrjpztcufü
schriffst/AQBRJPZTCUVFÜ
schrifft/AQBRJPZTCUVFÜ
schüddeln/qrgu
schutern/ycjhtuxü
schuven/aqrjpzkgtycfx
schoov/DAQRJPZKGTYCVFX
schaven/AQRJPZKGTYCVFX
seggen/IDWMOAQRPTUVF
sehn/aqrjptycufx
seeg/AQBRJPTYCUVFX
seien/JAUsjau
setten/IDWMOAQBRJPZKGTCYUVFXÜL
setten/aqrjpzkgtcyufxül
sungen/PF
slaan/aqbrcjhptufx
sla/AQBRCJHPTUFX
slaat/AQBRCJHPTUFX
sloog/DAQBRCJHPTUFX
slaap/WBRJTUVFX
slöppt/BRJTUVFX
sleuder/CYZRUVXs
sleken/enCYJAZRGX
sluten/aqjptu
smeren/abjhpzktuvfx
smitt/AQBJGTYCX
snappen/IDWMOJHPTX
snitt/AQBRJPTUVX
sneed/DAQBRJPTUVX
speel/DWMOAQJPTUVF
spiegen/iwarchzkgux
spiggt/ABRCHZKGUX
spinnen/ju
spölen/qarychgufx
spören/RHPZUF
spreken/QABRZRGUVF
sprook/DQABRZRGUVF
sproken/QABRZRGUVF
spröhen/abrcjhpzkgtuv
steihst/AQBRJPTUVF
steken/aqrjptcux
stickt/AQBRJPTCUVX
stick/AQBRJPTCUVX
stellen/aqbryjptcuvfxül
stimmen/aqjt
störten/IDWMOQJ
stöten/aqrycptux
dörstreek/s
strieken/arjufx
streek/DARJUVFX
stüer/sARYCUVX
sugen/qarjpzkgux
suug/WQARJPZKGUX
sogen/QARJPZKGUX
sweev/sAQRYCJFXÜ
sweeven/aqrycjfxü
sweten/IDW
tasten/qzkgf
teek/DWMOAQBCJPUV
tellen/qrpf
tövern/IDWMOBYVX
trecken/qabrycjhpzkgtuvfxü
trocken/IDQABRYCJHPZKGTUVFXÜ
tusch/sJUV
verantwoorden/IDWMO
wanneln/ü
warven/IDWMOAQBJÜ
wassen/IDWABRYCJPTUV
wussen/IDABRYCJPTUV
weerten/IDWMOQBPUV
wennen/IDAQBJPCVX
wendten/AQBJPCVX
wohren/IDWMOBV
wullen/IDWMO
